District of Columbia statutes.
25-743

Tie-in purchases prohibited.

(a)

A manufacturer or wholesaler shall not require, directly or indirectly, a retailer to purchase any type of alcoholic beverage or other commodity in order to purchase any other alcoholic beverage.

(b)

A licensee under an off-premises retailer’s license shall not require, directly or indirectly, a consumer to purchase any type of alcoholic beverage or other commodity in order to purchase any other alcoholic beverage.

May 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-298, § 101, 48 DCR 2959